Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,117
Rules and regulations; institutions adopt; department; duties.

The governing boards of educational institutions shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations needed to carry out the Nebraska Equal Opportunity in Education Act. The State Department of Education shall provide such technical assistance in the development of these rules and regulations as may be requested by the governing board of any public school system of elementary or secondary schools. Governing boards of educational institutions, with the advice of staff, shall formulate activities and programs needed to carry out the act.

Laws 1982, LB 628, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3004;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 121.